Utah statutes.
34-32-4.   Exceptions from chapter.

(1)  The provisions of this chapter do not apply to carriers as that term is defined in the Railway Labor Act passed by the Congress of the United States, June 21, 1934. 48 Stat. 1189, U.S. Code, Title 45, Section 151.

(2)  Nothing in this chapter is intended to, or may be construed to, preempt any requirement of federal law.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

